Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.080

Duration of registration—Association with issuer, broker-dealer, federal covered adviser, or investment adviser—Notice to director—Extension of licensing period.

Registration of a broker-dealer, salesperson, investment adviser representative, or investment adviser shall be effective for a one-year period unless the director by rule or order provides otherwise. The director by rule or order may schedule registration or renewal so that all registrations and renewals expire December 31st. The director may adjust the fee for registration or renewal proportionately. The registration of a salesperson or investment adviser representative is not effective during any period when the salesperson is not employed by or associated with an issuer or a registered broker-dealer or when the investment adviser representative is not employed by or associated with an investment adviser registered under this chapter or a federal covered adviser who has made a notice filing pursuant to RCW 21.20.050. To be employed by or associated with an issuer, broker-dealer, federal covered adviser, or investment adviser within the meaning of this section notice, either in writing or in some other format as the director may by rule or otherwise specify, must be given to the director. When a salesperson begins or terminates employment or association with an issuer or registered broker-dealer, the salesperson and the issuer or broker-dealer shall promptly notify the director. When an investment adviser representative registered under this chapter begins or terminates employment or association with an investment adviser registered under this chapter or a federal covered adviser required to make a notice filing pursuant to RCW 21.20.050, the investment adviser representative and investment adviser or federal covered adviser shall promptly notify the director.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the director may, from time to time, extend the duration of a licensing period for the purpose of staggering renewal periods. Such extension of a licensing period shall be by rule adopted in accordance with the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW. Such rules may provide a method for imposing and collecting such additional proportional fee as may be required for the extended period.

[ 1998 c 15 s 7; 1994 c 256 s 8; 1981 c 272 s 3; 1979 ex.s. c 68 s 5; 1975 1st ex.s. c 84 s 5; 1959 c 282 s 8.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.